California, session 20252026, AB919.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2166.9 is added to the Elections Code, to read:2166.9. (a) For purposes of this section:(1) “Authorized individual” means a person who holds power of attorney for an individual with a cognitive impairment.(2) “Cognitive impairment” includes dementia, Alzheimer’s, and any other condition that, in the sole discretion of the Secretary of State, impairs memory or judgment.(b) A county elections official, upon application of an authorized individual, shall grant confidential voter status to an individual with a cognitive impairment and make confidential their residence address, telephone number, and email address appearing on the affidavit of registration, in accordance with this section.(c) The application by the authorized individual shall contain a statement, signed under penalty of perjury, that the person is an authorized individual as defined in subdivision (a) and that the individual for whom they hold power of attorney has a cognitive impairment. The application shall be a public record.(d) The elections official, in producing any list, roster, or index, shall exclude voters with confidential voter status granted under this section.(e) If the individual with a cognitive impairment moves to a new county, the authorized individual may reapply for confidential voter status pursuant to subdivision (b). The elections official of the new county, upon notice of the confidential voter moving into the county, shall do all of the following:(1) Honor the confidential voter status granted by the former county.(2) Exclude the confidential voter in any list, roster, or index.(f) An action in negligence shall not be maintained against any government entity or officer or employee thereof as a result of the disclosure of the information that is the subject of this section except by a showing of gross negligence or willfulness.(g) The Secretary of State shall submit to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, no later than January 10 of each year, a report that includes the total number of applications received for confidential voter status pursuant to this section. The report shall disclose the number of individuals granted confidential voter status and shall also describe any allegations of misuse of confidential voter information for election purposes.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution for certain costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district because, in that regard, this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________